Washington statutes.
RCW 39.84.020

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board of directors" means the board of directors of a public corporation.

(2) "Construction" or "construct" means construction and acquisition, whether by devise, purchase, gift, lease, or otherwise.

(3) "Facilities" means land, rights in land, buildings, structures, docks, wharves, machinery, transmission equipment, public broadcast equipment, landscaping, utilities, approaches, roadways and parking, handling and storage areas, and similar ancillary facilities.

(4) "Financing document" means a lease, sublease, installment sale agreement, conditional sale agreement, loan agreement, mortgage, deed of trust guaranty agreement, or other agreement for the purpose of providing funds to pay or secure debt service on revenue bonds.

(5) "Improvement" means reconstruction, remodeling, rehabilitation, extension, and enlargement; and "to improve" means to reconstruct, to remodel, to rehabilitate, to extend, and to enlarge.

(6) "Industrial development facilities" means manufacturing, processing, research, production, assembly, warehousing, transportation, public broadcasting, pollution control, solid waste disposal, energy facilities, sports facilities, parking facilities associated with industrial development facilities as defined in this section or with historic properties as defined in RCW 84.26.020 and industrial parks. For the purposes of this section, the term "sports facilities" shall not include facilities which are constructed for use by members of a private club or as integral or subordinate parts of a hotel or motel, or which are not available on a regular basis for general public use.

(7) "Industrial park" means acquisition and development of land as the site for an industrial park. For the purposes of this chapter, "development of land" includes the provision of water, sewage, drainage, or similar facilities, or of transportation, energy, or communication facilities, which are incidental to the use of the site as an industrial park, but does not include the provision of structures or buildings.

(8) "Municipality" means a city, town, county, or port district of this state.

(9) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking official action or adopting a legislative decision by any municipality, whether known as a resolution, ordinance, or otherwise.

(10) "Project costs" means costs of (a) acquisition, construction, and improvement of any facilities included in an industrial development facility; (b) architectural, engineering, consulting, accounting, and legal costs related directly to the development, financing, and construction of an industrial development facility, including costs of studies assessing the feasibility of an industrial development facility; (c) finance costs, including discounts, if any, the costs of issuing revenue bonds, and costs incurred in carrying out any trust agreement; (d) interest during construction and during the six months after estimated completion of construction, and capitalized debt service or repair and replacement or other appropriate reserves; (e) the refunding of any outstanding obligations incurred for any of the costs outlined in this subsection; and (f) other costs incidental to any of the costs listed in this section.

(11) "Revenue bond" means a nonrecourse revenue bond, nonrecourse revenue note, or other nonrecourse revenue obligation issued for the purpose of financing an industrial development facility on an interim or permanent basis.

(12) "User" means one or more persons acting as lessee, purchaser, mortgagor, or borrower under a financing document and may include a party who transfers the right of use and occupancy to another party by lease, sublease, or otherwise.

[ 1986 c 309 s 1; 1986 c 308 s 2; 1985 c 439 s 1; 1983 1st ex.s. c 51 s 1; 1981 c 300 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1986 c 308 s 2 and by 1986 c 309 s 1, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Severability—1986 c 308: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 308 s 3.]